District of Columbia statutes.
10-1401

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter:

(1)

The term “plat” means the plat filed in the Office of the Surveyor of the District of Columbia under S.O. 92-252.

(2)

The term “District” means the District of Columbia.

(3)

The term “Islands” means Heritage Island and all of that portion of Kingman Island located south of Benning Road and within the District of Columbia and the Anacostia River, being a portion of United States Reservation 343, Section F, as specified and legally described on the Survey.

(4)

The term “National Children’s Island” means a cultural, educational, and family-oriented recreation park, together with a children’s playground, to be developed and operated in accordance with subchapter II of this chapter.

(5)

The term “playground” means the children’s playground that is part of National Children’s Island and includes all lands on the Islands located south of East Capitol Street.

(6)

The term “recreation park” means the cultural, educational, and family-oriented recreation park that is part of National Children’s Island.

(7)

The term “Secretary” means the Secretary of the Interior.

(8)

The term “Survey” means the ALTA/ACSM Land Title Survey prepared by Dewberry & Davis and dated February 12, 1994.

July 19, 1996, 110 Stat. 1416, Pub. L. 104-163, § 2
For temporary (90 day) addition of §§ 10-1503 to 10-1505, see § 2(a) to (c) of Draft Master Plan for Public Reservation 13 Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-13, January 27, 2003, 50 DCR 1488).
1981 Ed., § 9-901.